District of Columbia statutes.
41-315

Rules.

The Mayor, pursuant to subchapter I of Chapter 5 of Title 2 [§ 2-501 et seq.], may issue rules to implement the provisions of this chapter.

June 16, 2015, D.C. Law 20-278, § 115, 62 DCR 1920